da: Board konkav form: Konveks; Dobbelt-konkav; Flad; Radial; V-konkav; W-konkav; Andet
nb: Brett med konkav form: Konveks; Dobbelt-konkav; Flat; Radial; V-konkav; W-konkav; Annet
tr: Tahta içbükey şekli: Dışbükey; Çift içbükey; Düz; Radyal; V içbükey; W içbükey; Diğer
pl: Wklęsły kształt deski: Wypukłe; Podwójnie wklęsły; Płaski; Promieniowe; Wklęsłość typu V; Wklęsłość typu WW; Inne
sl-SI: Konkavna oblika deske: Konveksno; Dvojno konkavno; Ravno; Radialno; V-konkavno; W-konkavno; Drugo
sk-SK: Vypuklý tvar dosky: Konvexný; Dvojitý konkávny; Plochý; Radiálny; V-konkávny; W-konkávny; Iné
de: Board mit konkaver Form: Konvex; Doppelt konkav; Flach; Radial; V-konkav; W-konkav; Sonstiges
sv: Bräda med konkav form: Konvex; Dubbelkonkav; Platt; Radiell; V-konkav; W-konkav; Övrigt
bg-BG: Форма на вдлъбнатата дъска: Изпъкнала; Двойно вдлъбната; Плоска; Радиална; V-образна вдлъбнатина; W-образна вдлъбнатина; Други
ru: Конкейв доски: Выпуклый; Двояковогнутый; Плоский; Радиальный; V-образный; W-образный; Другой
pt-BR: Forma côncava da prancha: Convexo; Duplo côncavo; Plana; Radial; V côncavo; W côncavo; Outro
en: Board concave shape: Convex; Double-concave; Flat; Radial; V-concave; W-concave; Other
zh-TW: 板凹面形狀: 凸面; 雙凹; 平坦; 徑向; V 型凹面; W 型凹面; 其他
th: รูปทรงเว้าของกระดาน: โค้งนูน; เว้าคู่; ราบ; แบบรัศมี; เว้ารูปตัว V; เว้ารูปตัว W; อื่นๆ
fi: Laudan kovera muoto: Kupera; Kaksoiskovera; Tasainen; Säteittäinen; V-kovera; W-kovera; Muu
pt-PT: Formato côncavo da prancha: Convexo; Duplo côncavo; Plano; Radial; V côncavo; W côncavo; Outro
hu: Deszka homorú formája: Konvex; Dupla konkáv; Lapos; Sugaras; V alakú konkáv; W alakú konkáv; Egyéb
lt-LT: Įgaubta lentos forma: Įgaubta; Dvigubai išgaubta; Plokščia; Radialinė; V formos; W formos; Kita
it: Forma concava della tavola: Convessa; Doppio raggio concavo; Piatto; Radiale; Concava a V; Concava a W; Altro
ro-RO: Formă concavă placă: Convexă; Dublu concavă; Plată; Radială; Concavă în V; Concavă în W; Altele
hr-HR: Oblik konkavnog dijela daske: Konveksan; Dvostruko konkavan; Ravan; Radijalan; V-konkavan; W-konkavan; Ostalo
el: Σχήμα κοίλανσης σανίδας: Κυρτό; Διπλά κοίλο; Επίπεδη; Ακτινωτό; Κοίλο V; Κοίλο W; Άλλο
ko: 오목 보드 모양: 볼록한; 이중 오목; 플랫; 방사형; V자오목형; W자오목형; 기타
nl: Concaaf board: Convex; Dubbel concaaf; Vlak; Radiaal; V-concaaf; W-concaaf; Andere
vi: Tấm ván có hình dạng lõm: Lồi; Lồi lõm hai mặt; Phẳng; Hình tia; Lõm chữ V; Lõm chữ W; Khác
es: Forma cóncava de la tabla: Convexo; Doble cóncavo; Puro; Radial; Cóncavo en V; Cóncavo en W; Otros
fr: Forme concave de la planche: Convexe; Double concave; Plate; Radial; Concave en V; Concave en W; Autre
cs: Konkávní tvar prkna: Konvexní; Dvojitě konkávní; Plochý; Radiální; V-konkávní; W-konkávní; Jiné
ja: ボードコンケーブ形状: 凸型; 両凹; フラット; ラジアル; V凹型; V凹型; その他
zh-CN: 板凹形状: 凸面; 双凹; 扁平的; 径向; V 型凹面; W 型凹面; 其他